Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3623
Sale of corn; fee; when paid.

(1) The following corn fee is levied upon all corn sold through commercial channels in Nebraska or delivered in Nebraska:

(a) Until and on September 30, 2024, one-half cent per bushel; and

(b) Beginning October 1, 2024, one cent per bushel.

(2) The fee shall be paid by the grower at the time of sale or delivery and shall be collected by the first purchaser. Under the Nebraska Corn Resources Act, no corn shall be subject to the fee more than once.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 23;

Laws 1983, LB 505, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 610, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1336, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1057, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 13.